Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that, when it established the department of children, youth, and families, it also created an independent oversight board to ensure transparency, accountability, and public confidence in the department's operations and decision making. The legislature further recognizes that, since the department's inception, both the agency and the oversight structure have evolved, and that the existing statutory framework no longer reflects the present scope, functions, or operations of either entity.(2) The legislature finds that a modernized oversight structure is necessary to promote effective collaboration between the department and its oversight body, ensure accountability for outcomes, and provide clear statutory direction consistent with the department's current stage of development.(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to reconstitute the existing oversight board as the department of children, youth, and families accountability board. The legislature intends that this new board retain its independent accountability role while operating under clarified authority, streamlined statutory provisions, and updated responsibilities that focus on policy review, performance monitoring, and public transparency. The legislature further intends to remove obsolete or duplicative provisions, align oversight activities with current departmental priorities, and strengthen the mechanisms through which the department and the oversight body coordinate to advance the well-being of Washington's children, youth, and families.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:(1) The oversight board for the department of children, youth, and families is dissolved and the department of children, youth, and families accountability board is established within the office of the governor. The board is created to provide independent accountability over the department's operations, policies, and outcomes. The purpose of the board is to monitor the department's progress toward achieving its stated goals and performance outcomes; ensure accountability in the department's decision-making and policy implementation; and promote transparency and public trust in the department's work on behalf of children, youth, and families.(2)(a) The board shall consist of the following members:(i) Two members of the Washington state senate, one member from each major caucus;(ii) Two members of the Washington state house of representatives, one member from each major caucus;(iii) One nonvoting representative from the governor's office;(iv) One subject matter expert in early learning;(v) One subject matter expert in child welfare;(vi) One subject matter expert in juvenile rehabilitation and justice;(vii) One subject matter expert in eliminating disparities in child outcomes by family income and race and ethnicity;(viii) One tribal representative from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(ix) One tribal representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(x) One current or former foster parent or kinship care provider representative;(xi) One representative of an organization that advocates for the best interest of children;(xii) One parent stakeholder group representative;(xiii) One law enforcement representative;(xiv) One child welfare caseworker representative;(xv) One early childhood learning program implementation practitioner;(xvi) One current or former foster youth under age 25;(xvii) One individual under age 25 with current or previous experience with the juvenile justice system;(xviii) One physician or advanced practice clinician with experience working with children or youth; and(xix) One judicial representative presiding over child welfare court proceedings or other children's matters.(b) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.(c) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators by majority vote and shall serve four-year terms. When nominating and approving members, the governor and appointed legislators must ensure that at least five of the board members reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.(3) The board has the following powers, which may be exercised by majority vote of the board:(a) To receive and request reports of the office of the family and children's ombuds;(b) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the office of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law;(c) To select its officers and adoption of rules for orderly procedure;(d) To request investigations by the office of the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;(e) To request and receive information, outcome data, documents, materials, and records from the department relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning; and(f) To determine whether the department is achieving the performance measures.(4) Upon receipt of records or data from the office of the family and children's ombuds or the department, the board is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the office of the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050. The provisions of RCW 43.06A.060 also apply to the board.(5) At least twice per year, the board shall convene or otherwise meet with individuals, groups, community representatives, and organizations engaged with or affected by the department's programs and services.(6) The board is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, except to the extent disclosure of records or information is otherwise confidential under state or federal law.(7) Records or information received by the board is confidential to the extent permitted by state or federal law. This subsection does not create an exception for records covered by RCW 13.50.100.(8) Unless specified otherwise, board members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while conducting business of the board when authorized by the board and within resources allocated for this purpose. Appointed legislators shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Board members with direct lived experience may receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 43.03.270 and are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(9) The board shall select, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.(10) The board shall maintain a staff not to exceed one full-time equivalent employee. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.(11) Starting in 2027, the board shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by July 1st of each odd-numbered year. The report will assess the department's progress toward meeting priority performance measures that are selected biennially by the board to maintain flexibility and data relevancy.Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.015 and 2025 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department of children, youth, and families is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The vision for the department is that Washington state's children and youth grow up safe and healthyâthriving physically, emotionally, and academically, nurtured by family and community.(b) The department, in partnership with state and local agencies, tribes, and communities, shall protect children and youth from harm and promote healthy development with effective, high quality prevention, intervention, and early education services delivered in an equitable manner. An important role for the department shall be to provide preventative services to help secure and preserve families in crisis. The department shall partner with the federally recognized Indian tribes to develop effective services for youth and families while respecting the sovereignty of those tribes and the government-to-government relationship. Nothing in chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. alters the duties, requirements, and policies of the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901 through 1963, as amended, or the Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW.(2) ((Beginning July 1, 2018, the))The department must develop definitions for, work plans to address, and metrics to measure the outcomes for children, youth, and families served by the department and must work with state agencies to ensure services for children, youth, and families are science-based, outcome-driven, data-informed, and collaborative.(3)(a) ((Beginning July 1, 2018, the))The department must establish short and long-term population level outcome measure goals, including metrics regarding reducing disparities by family income, race, and ethnicity in each outcome.(b) In addition to transparent, frequent reporting of the outcome measures in (c)(i) through (viii) of this subsection, the department must report to the legislature an examination of engagement, resource utilization, and outcomes for clients receiving department services and youth participating in juvenile court alternative programs funded by the department, no less than annually ((and beginning September 1, 2020)). The data in this report must be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and geography. This report must identify areas of focus to advance equity that will inform department strategies so that all children, youth, and families are thriving. Metrics detailing progress towards eliminating disparities and disproportionality over time must also be included. The report must also include information on department outcome measures, actions taken, progress toward these goals, and plans for the future year.(c) The outcome measures must include, but are not limited to:(i) Improving child development and school readiness through voluntary, high quality early learning opportunities as measured by: (A) Increasing the number and proportion of children kindergarten-ready as measured by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WAKids) assessment including mathematics; (B) increasing the proportion of children in early learning programs that have achieved the level 3 or higher early achievers quality standard; and (C) increasing the available supply of licensed child care in child care centers, outdoor nature-based child care, and family homes, including providers not receiving state subsidy;(ii) Preventing child abuse and neglect;(iii) Improving child and youth safety, permanency, and well-being as measured by: (A) Reducing the number of children entering out-of-home care; (B) reducing a child's length of stay in out-of-home care; (C) reducing maltreatment of youth while in out-of-home care; (D) licensing more foster homes than there are children in foster care; (E) reducing the number of children that reenter out-of-home care within twelve months; (F) increasing the stability of placements for children in out-of-home care; and (G) developing strategies to demonstrate to foster families that their service and involvement is highly valued by the department, as demonstrated by the development of strategies to consult with foster families regarding future placement of a foster child currently placed with a foster family;(iv) Improving reconciliation of children and youth with their families as measured by: (A) Increasing family reunification; and (B) increasing the number of youth who are reunified with their family of origin;(v) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, improving adolescent outcomes including reducing multisystem involvement and homelessness; and increasing school graduation rates and successful transitions to adulthood for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;(vi) Reducing future demand for mental health and substance use disorder treatment for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;(vii) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, reducing criminal justice involvement and recidivism as measured by: (A) An increase in the number of youth who successfully complete the terms of diversion or alternative sentencing options; (B) a decrease in the number of youth who commit subsequent crimes; and (C) eliminating the discharge of youth from institutional settings into homelessness; and(viii) Eliminating racial and ethnic disproportionality and disparities in system involvement and across child and youth outcomes in collaboration with other state agencies.(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2018, the))The department must:(a) Lead ongoing collaborative work to minimize or eliminate systemic barriers to effective, integrated services in collaboration with state agencies serving children, youth, and families;(b) Identify necessary improvements and updates to statutes relevant to their responsibilities and proposing legislative changes to the governor no less than biennially;(c) Help create a data-focused environment in which there are aligned outcomes and shared accountability for achieving those outcomes, with shared, real-time data that is accessible to authorized persons interacting with the family, child, or youth to identify what is needed and which services would be effective;(d) Lead the provision of state services to adolescents, focusing on key transition points for youth, including exiting foster care and institutions, and coordinating with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to address the unique needs of homeless youth; and(e) Create and annually update a list of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents in partnership with foster parent representatives. The list of foster parent rights and responsibilities must be posted on the department's website, provided to individuals participating in a foster parent orientation before licensure, provided to foster parents in writing at the time of licensure, and provided to foster parents applying for license renewal.(5) The department is accountable to the public. To ensure transparency, ((beginning December 30, 2018,)) agency performance data for the services provided by the department, including outcome data for contracted services, must be available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws, federal protections, and individual rights to privacy. Publicly available data must include budget and funding decisions, performance-based contracting data, including data for contracted services, and performance data on metrics identified in this section. The board must work with the secretary and director to develop the most effective and cost-efficient ways to make department data available to the public, including making this data readily available on the department's website.(6) The department shall ensure that all new and renewed contracts for services are performance-based.(7) The department must execute all new and renewed contracts for services in accordance with this section and consistent with RCW 74.13B.020. When contracted services are managed through a network administrator or other third party, the department must execute data-sharing agreements with the entities managing the contracts to track provider performance measures. Contracts with network administrators or other third parties must provide the contract administrator the ability to shift resources from one provider to another, to evaluate individual provider performance, to add or delete services in consultation with the department, and to reinvest savings from increased efficiencies into new or improved services in their catchment area. Whenever possible, contractor performance data must be made available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws and individual rights to privacy.(8)(((a) The board shall begin its work and call the first meeting of the board on or after July 1, 2018. The board shall immediately assume the duties of the legislative children's oversight committee, as provided for in RCW 74.13.570 and assume the full functions of the board as provided for in this section by July 1, 2019. The office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall provide quarterly updates regarding the implementation of the department to the board between July 1, 2018, and July 1, 2019.(b) The office of the family and children's ombuds shall establish the board. The board is authorized for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring that the department achieves the stated outcomes of chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., and complies with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to early learning, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and children and family services.(9)(a) The board shall consist of the following members:(i) Two senators and two representatives from the legislature with one member from each major caucus;(ii) One nonvoting representative from the governor's office;(iii) One subject matter expert in early learning;(iv) One subject matter expert in child welfare;(v) One subject matter expert in juvenile rehabilitation and justice;(vi) One subject matter expert in eliminating disparities in child outcomes by family income and race and ethnicity;(vii) One tribal representative from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(viii) One tribal representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(ix) One current or former foster parent representative;(x) One representative of an organization that advocates for the best interest of the child;(xi) One parent stakeholder group representative;(xii) One law enforcement representative;(xiii) One child welfare caseworker representative;(xiv) One early childhood learning program implementation practitioner;(xv) One current or former foster youth under age twenty-five;(xvi) One individual under age twenty-five with current or previous experience with the juvenile justice system;(xvii) One physician with experience working with children or youth; and(xviii) One judicial representative presiding over child welfare court proceedings or other children's matters.(b) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.(c) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators by majority vote, and serve four-year terms. When nominating and approving members after July 28, 2019, the governor and appointed legislators must ensure that at least five of the board members reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.(10) The board has the following powers, which may be exercised by majority vote of the board:(a) To receive reports of the office of the family and children's ombuds;(b) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the office of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law;(c) To select its officers and adoption of rules for orderly procedure;(d) To request investigations by the office of the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;(e) To request and receive information, outcome data, documents, materials, and records from the department relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning;(f) To determine whether the department is achieving the performance measures;(g) If final review is requested by a licensee, to review whether department licensors appropriately and consistently applied agency rules in inspection reports that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395 in cases that have already been reviewed by the internal review process described in RCW 43.216.395 with the authority to overturn, change, or uphold such decisions;(h) To conduct annual reviews of a sample of department contracts for services from a variety of program and service areas to ensure that those contracts are performance-based and to assess the measures included in each contract; and(i) Upon receipt of records or data from the office of the family and children's ombuds or the department, the board is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the office of the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050. The provisions of RCW 43.06A.060 also apply to the board.(11) The board has general oversight over the performance and policies of the department and shall provide advice and input to the department and the governor.(12) The board must no less than twice per year convene stakeholder meetings to allow feedback to the board regarding contracting with the department, departmental use of local, state, private, and federal funds, and other matters as relating to carrying out the duties of the department.(13) The board shall review existing surveys of providers, customers, parent groups, and external services to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services, and shall conduct additional surveys as needed to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services.(14) The board is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, except to the extent disclosure of records or information is otherwise confidential under state or federal law.(15) Records or information received by the board is confidential to the extent permitted by state or federal law. This subsection does not create an exception for records covered by RCW 13.50.100.(16) Unless specified otherwise, board members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while conducting business of the board when authorized by the board and within resources allocated for this purpose. Appointed legislators shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Board members with direct lived experience may receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 43.03.270 and are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(17) The board shall select, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.(18) The board shall maintain a staff not to exceed one full-time equivalent employee. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.(19) The board shall issue an annual report to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year with an initial report delivered by December 1, 2019. The report must review the department's progress towards meeting stated performance measures and desired performance outcomes, and must also include a review of the department's strategic plan, policies, and rules.(20))) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and sections 1 and 2 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Board" means the ((oversight board for children, youth, and families established in subsection (8) of this section))department of children, youth, and families accountability board established in section 2 of this act.(b) (("Direct lived experience" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(c))) "Director" means the director of the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability.(((d)))(c) "Performance-based contract" means results-oriented contracting that focuses on the quality or outcomes that tie at least a portion of the contractor's payment, contract extensions, or contract renewals to the achievement of specific measurable performance standards and requirements.Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.395 and 2021 c 304 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall develop an internal review process to determine whether department licensors have appropriately and consistently applied agency rules in inspection reports that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards. Adverse licensing decisions including license denial, suspension, revocation, modification, or nonrenewal pursuant to RCW 43.216.325 or imposition of civil fines pursuant to RCW 43.216.335 are not subject to the internal review process in this section, but may be appealed using the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.(a) "Child care facility licensing compliance agreement" means an agreement issued by the department in lieu of the department taking enforcement action against a child care provider that contains: (i) A description of the violation and the rule or law that was violated; (ii) a statement from the licensee regarding the proposed plan to comply with the rule or law; (iii) the date the violation must be corrected; (iv) information regarding other licensing action that may be imposed if compliance does not occur by the required date; and (v) the signature of the licensor and licensee or the licensee's delegate.(b) "Health and safety standards" means rules or requirements developed by the department to protect the health and safety of children against risk of bodily, mental, or psychological injury, harm, illness, or death.(3) The internal review process shall be conducted by the following six individuals:(a) Three department employees who may include child care licensors; and(b) Three child care providers selected by the department from names submitted by the oversight board for children, youth, and families established in RCW 43.216.015.(4) The internal review process established in this section may overturn, change, or uphold a department licensing decision by majority vote. In the event that the six individuals conducting the internal review process are equally divided, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall make the decision of the internal review process. The internal review process must provide the parties with a written decision of the outcome after completion of the internal review process. A licensee must request a review under the internal review process within ten days of the development of an inspection report and the internal review process must be completed within sixty days after the request from the licensee to initiate the internal review process is received.(((5) A licensee may request a final review by the oversight board for children, youth, and families after completing the internal review process established in this section by giving notice to the department and the oversight board for children, youth, and families within ten days of receiving the written decision produced by the internal review process.))Sec. 5. RCW 13.50.010 and 2024 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Detention facility" means:(i) Any detention facility as defined under RCW 13.40.020; and(ii) Any juvenile correctional facility under alternative administration operated by a consortium of counties under RCW 13.04.035;(b) "Good faith effort to pay" means a juvenile offender has either (i) paid the principal amount in full; (ii) made at least 80 percent of the value of full monthly payments within the period from disposition or deferred disposition until the time the amount of restitution owed is under review; or (iii) can show good cause why he or she paid an amount less than 80 percent of the value of full monthly payments;(c) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following: Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, detention center, attorney general, the ((oversight board for))department of children, youth, and families accountability board, the office of the family and children's ombuds, the department of social and health services and its contracting agencies, the department of children, youth, and families and its contracting agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight committee created under RCW 72.05.415;(d) "Managed care organization" and "behavioral health administrative services organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 71.24.025;(e) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions, memorandums, briefs, notices of hearing or appearance, service documents, witness and exhibit lists, findings of the court and court orders, agreements, judgments, decrees, notices of appeal, as well as documents prepared by the clerk, including court minutes, letters, warrants, waivers, affidavits, declarations, invoices, and the index to clerk papers;(f) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the case;(g) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the records and reports of the probation counselor.(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately from the official juvenile court file.(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to maintain accurate records. To this end:(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information. Any information in records maintained by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of its records and prevent tampering with them; and(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to ensure the completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies with respect to matters in its files.(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries concerning records.(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain confidential.(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or destroyed.(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes. Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.(9) The court shall release to the caseload forecast council the records needed for its research and data-gathering functions. Access to caseload forecast data may be permitted by the council for research purposes only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records or information will be preserved.(10) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the caseload forecast council upon request. The commission shall not disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without the named individual's written permission.(11) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority to compel disclosure shall not apply to the oversight board for children, youth, and families or the office of the family and children's ombuds.(12) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the research copy is restricted to the administrative office of the courts for research purposes as authorized by the supreme court or by state statute. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy. Data contained in the research copy may be shared with other governmental agencies as authorized by state statute, pursuant to data-sharing and research agreements, and consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.270 and 13.50.100(3).(13) The court shall release to the Washington state office of public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records.(14) The court shall release to the Washington state office of civil legal aid records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.53.045. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of civil legal aid. The Washington state office of civil legal aid shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records, and shall, as soon as possible, destroy any retained notes or records obtained under this section that are not necessary for its functions related to RCW 2.53.045.(15) For purposes of providing for the educational success of youth in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with meeting the educational needs of current and former foster youth to another state agency or state agency's contracted provider responsible under state law or contract for assisting current and former foster youth to attain educational success. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.(16) For the purpose of ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose to the department of commerce and its contracted providers responsible under state law or contract for providing services to youth, only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care who are admitted to crisis residential centers or HOPE centers under contract with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection. Records disclosed under this subsection retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and may not be further disclosed except as permitted by this chapter and federal law.(17) For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health and well-being of children in foster care to the department of social and health services, the health care authority, or their contracting agencies. For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and to provide for the coordination of health care and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of social and health services and the health care authority may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care to the department of children, youth, and families, or its contracting agencies. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.(18) For the purpose of investigating child sexual abuse, online sexual exploitation and commercial sexual exploitation of minors, and child fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal neglect cases for the well-being of the child, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with such an investigation pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.175. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.(19) The records of a person confined in a detention facility may be made available to managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations as defined in RCW 71.24.025 for the purpose of care coordination activities. The receiving organization must hold records in confidence and comply with all relevant state and federal statutes regarding privacy of disclosed records.--- END ---